tests/heb_vow.twoc
Alphabet

ם כ ה ג ש ז צ נ ל פ ע י ב ף ץ מ ך ת ח ד ס ר א ט ק ן
ֶ  ָ  ִ ַ

%[perf%]:0
%[impf%]:0

%{V1%}:ָ
%{V2%}:ַ

;

Sets

blah = %[perf%] %[impf%] ;

Rules

"imperfect vowel 1"
%{V1%}:0 <=> _ :* %[impf%]:0 ;

"imperfect vowel 2"
%{V2%}:ֹ <=> _ :* %[impf%]:0 ;
